Utah statutes.
59-12-1503.   Opinion question election -- Base -- Rate -- Imposition of tax
-- Use of tax revenues -- Administration, collection, and enforcement of tax
by commission -- Administrative fee -- Enactment or repeal of tax --
Annexation -- Notice.
(1) (a)  Subject to the other provisions of this part, the county legislative
body of a qualifying county may impose a sales and use tax of:
(i)  beginning on April 1, 2004, and ending on December 31, 2007, .25%:
(A)  on the transactions:
(I)  described in Subsection 59-12-103(1); and
(II)  within the county, including the cities and towns within the county;
(B)  for the purposes determined by the county legislative body in accordance
with Subsection (2); and
(C)  in addition to any other sales and use tax authorized under this chapter;
or
(ii)  beginning on January 1, 2008, up to .30%:
(A)  on the transactions:
(I)  described in Subsection 59-12-103(1); and
(II)  within the county, including the cities and towns within the county;
(B)  for the purposes determined by the county legislative body in accordance
with Subsection (2); and
(C)  in addition to any other sales and use tax authorized under this chapter.
(b)  Notwithstanding Subsection (1)(a), a county legislative body may not
impose a tax under this section on:
(i)  the sales and uses described in Section 59-12-104 to the extent the sales
and uses are exempt from taxation under Section 59-12-104; and
(ii)  except as provided in Subsection (1)(d), amounts paid or charged for
food and food ingredients.
(c)  For purposes of this Subsection (1), the location of a transaction shall
be determined in accordance with Sections 59-12-211 through 59-12-215.
(d)  A county legislative body imposing a tax under this section shall impose
the tax on amounts paid or charged for food and food ingredients if the food
and food ingredients are sold as part of a bundled transaction attributable to
food and food ingredients and tangible personal property other than food and
food ingredients.
(2) (a)  Subject to Subsection (2)(b), before obtaining the approval required
by Subsection (3), a county legislative body shall adopt a resolution
specifying the percentage of revenues the county will receive from the tax
under this part that will be allocated to fund one or more of the following:
(i)  a project or service relating to a fixed guideway system for the portion
of the project or service that is performed within the county;
(ii)  a project or service relating to a system for public transit for the
portion of the project or service that is performed within the county; or
(iii)  the following relating to a state highway or a local highway of
regional significance within the county:
(A)  a project beginning on or after the day on which a county legislative
body imposes a tax under this part only within the county involving:
(I)  new construction;
(II)  a renovation;
(III)  an improvement; or
(IV)  an environmental study;
(B)  debt service on a project described in Subsections (2)(a)(iii)(A)(I)
through (IV); or
(C)  bond issuance costs relating to a project described in Subsections
(2)(a)(iii)(A)(I) through (IV).
(b) (i)  A county legislative body shall in the resolution required by
Subsection (2)(a) allocate as required by Subsection (2)(a) 100% of the
revenues the county will receive from the tax under this part.
(ii)  For purposes of this Subsection (2)(b), the revenues a county will
receive from the tax under this part do not include amounts retained by the
commission in accordance with Subsection (8).
(3) (a)  Except as provided in Subsection (3)(d), before imposing a tax under
this part, a county legislative body shall:
(i)  obtain approval from a majority of the members of the county legislative
body to:
(A)  impose the tax; and
(B)  allocate the revenues the county will receive from the tax in accordance
with the resolution adopted in accordance with Subsection (2); and
(ii)  subject to Subsection (3)(b), submit an opinion question to the county's
registered voters voting on the imposition of the tax so that each registered
voter has the opportunity to express the registered voter's opinion on whether
a tax should be imposed under this part.
(b)  The opinion question required by Subsection (3)(a)(ii) shall state the
allocations specified in the resolution:
(i)  adopted in accordance with Subsection (2); and
(ii)  approved by the county legislative body in accordance with Subsection
(3)(a).
(c)  The election required by this Subsection (3) shall be held:
(i) (A)  at a regular general election; and
(B)  in accordance with the procedures and requirements of Title 20A, Election
Code, governing regular general elections; or
(ii) (A)  at a special election called by the county legislative body;
(B)  only on the date of a municipal general election provided in Subsection
20A-1-202(1); and
(C)  in accordance with the procedures and requirements of Section 20A-1-203.
(d)  A county is not subject to the voter approval requirements of this
section if:
(i)  on December 31, 2007, the county imposes a tax of .25% under this
section; and
(ii)  on or after January 1, 2008, the county increases the tax rate under
this section to up to .30%.
(4) (a)  Subject to Subsection (8), if a county legislative body determines
that a majority of the county's registered voters voting on the imposition of
the tax have voted in favor of the imposition of the tax in accordance with
Subsection (3), the county legislative body may impose the tax by a majority
vote of all of the members of the county legislative body.
(b)  If a county legislative body imposes a tax under Subsection (4)(a), the
revenues generated by the tax shall be:
(i)  allocated in accordance with the allocations specified in the resolution
under Subsection (2); and
(ii)  expended as provided in this part.
(5)  If a county legislative body allocates revenues generated by the tax for
a project described in Subsection (2)(a)(iii)(A), before beginning the state
highway project within the county, the county legislative body shall:
(a)  obtain approval from the Transportation Commission to complete the
project; and
(b)  enter into an interlocal agreement:
(i)  established in accordance with Title 11, Chapter 13, Interlocal
Cooperation Act;
(ii)  with the Department of Transportation; and
(iii)  to complete the project.
(6) (a)  If after a county legislative body imposes a tax under Subsection (4)
the county legislative body seeks to change the allocation of the tax
specified in the resolution under Subsection (2), the county legislative body
may change the allocation of the tax by:
(i)  adopting a resolution in accordance with Subsection (2) specifying the
percentage of revenues the county will receive from the tax under this part
that will be allocated to fund one or more of the systems or projects
described in Subsection (2);
(ii)  obtaining approval to change the allocation of the tax from a majority
of the members of the county legislative body; and
(iii) (A)  submitting an opinion question to the county's registered voters
voting on changing the allocation of the tax so that each registered voter has
the opportunity to express the registered voter's opinion on whether the
allocation of the tax should be changed; and
(B)  obtaining approval to change the allocation of the tax from a majority of
the county's registered voters voting on changing the allocation of the tax.
(b) (i)  The opinion question required by Subsection (6)(a)(iii) shall state
the allocations specified in the resolution:
(A)  adopted in accordance with Subsection (6)(a)(i); and
(B)  approved by the county legislative body in accordance with Subsection
(6)(a)(ii).
(ii)  The election required by Subsection (6)(a)(iii) shall follow the
procedures and requirements of Title 11, Chapter 14, Local Government Bonding
Act.
(7) (a) (i)  Except as provided in Subsection (7)(a)(ii), revenues generated
by a tax under this part that are allocated for a purpose described in
Subsection (2)(a)(i) or (ii) shall be transmitted:
(A)  by the commission;
(B)  to the county;
(C)  monthly; and
(D)  by electronic funds transfer.
(ii)  Notwithstanding Subsection (7)(a)(i), a county may request that the
commission transfer the revenues described in Subsection (7)(a)(i):
(A)  directly to a public transit district:
(I)  organized under Title 17B, Chapter 2a, Part 8, Public Transit District
Act; and
(II)  designated by the county; and
(B)  by providing written notice to the commission:
(I)  requesting the revenues to be transferred directly to a public transit
district as provided in Subsection (7)(a)(ii)(A); and
(II)  designating the public transit district to which the revenues are
requested to be transferred.
(b)  Revenues generated by a tax under this part that are allocated for a
purpose described in Subsection (2)(a)(iii) shall be:
(i)  deposited into the State Highway Projects Within Counties Fund created by
Section 72-2-121.1; and
(ii)  expended as provided in Section 72-2-121.1.
(8) (a) (i)  Except as provided in Subsection (8)(a)(ii), the tax authorized
under this part shall be administered, collected, and enforced in accordance
with:
(A)  the same procedures used to administer, collect, and enforce the tax
under:
(I)  Part 1, Tax Collection; or
(II)  Part 2, Local Sales and Use Tax Act; and
(B)  Chapter 1, General Taxation Policies.
(ii)  Notwithstanding Subsection (8)(a)(i), a tax under this part is not
subject to Subsections 59-12-205(2) through (6).
(b) (i)  The commission may retain an amount of tax collected under this part
of not to exceed the lesser of:
(A)  1.5%; or
(B)  an amount equal to the cost to the commission of administering this part.
(ii)  Any amount the commission retains under Subsection (8)(b)(i) shall be:
(A)  placed in the Sales and Use Tax Administrative Fees Account; and
(B)  used as provided in Subsection 59-12-206(2).
(9) (a) (i)  Except as provided in Subsection (9)(b) or (c), if, on or after
April 1, 2008, a county enacts or repeals a tax under this part, the enactment
or repeal shall take effect:
(A)  on the first day of a calendar quarter; and
(B)  after a 90-day period beginning on the date the commission receives
notice meeting the requirements of Subsection (9)(a)(ii) from the county.
(ii)  The notice described in Subsection (9)(a)(i)(B) shall state:
(A)  that the county will enact or repeal a tax under this part;
(B)  the statutory authority for the tax described in Subsection
(9)(a)(ii)(A);
(C)  the effective date of the tax described in Subsection (9)(a)(ii)(A); and
(D)  if the county enacts the tax described in Subsection (9)(a)(ii)(A), the
rate of the tax.
(b) (i) The enactment of a tax shall take effect on the first day of the first
billing period:
(A)  that begins after the effective date of the enactment of the tax; and
(B)  if the billing period for the transaction begins before the effective
date of the enactment of the tax under Subsection (1).
(ii) The repeal of a tax shall take effect on the first day of the last
billing period:
(A)  that began before the effective date of the repeal of the tax; and
(B)  if the billing period for the transaction begins before the effective
date of the repeal of the tax imposed under Subsection (1).
(c) (i) If a tax due under this chapter on a catalogue sale is computed on the
basis of sales and use tax rates published in the catalogue, an enactment or
repeal of a tax described in Subsection (9)(a)(i) takes effect:
(A)  on the first day of a calendar quarter; and
(B)  beginning 60 days after the effective date of the enactment or repeal
under Subsection (9)(a)(i).
(ii)  In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking
Act, the commission may by rule define the term "catalogue sale."
(d) (i)  Except as provided in Subsection (9)(e) or (f), if, for an annexation
that occurs on or after July 1, 2004, the annexation will result in the
enactment or repeal of a tax under this part for an annexing area, the
enactment or repeal shall take effect:
(A)  on the first day of a calendar quarter; and
(B)  after a 90-day period beginning on the date the commission receives
notice meeting the requirements of Subsection (9)(d)(ii) from the county that
annexes the annexing area.
(ii)  The notice described in Subsection (9)(d)(i)(B) shall state:
(A)  that the annexation described in Subsection (9)(d)(i)(B) will result in
an enactment or repeal of a tax under this part for the annexing area;
(B)  the statutory authority for the tax described in Subsection
(9)(d)(ii)(A);
(C)  the effective date of the tax described in Subsection (9)(d)(ii)(A); and
(D)  the rate of the tax described in Subsection (9)(d)(ii)(A).
(e) (i) The enactment of a tax shall take effect on the first day of the first
billing period:
(A)  that begins after the effective date of the enactment of the tax; and
(B)  if the billing period for the transaction begins before the effective
date of the enactment of the tax under Subsection (1).
(ii) The repeal of a tax shall take effect on the first day of the last
billing period:
(A)  that began before the effective date of the repeal of the tax; and
(B)  if the billing period for the transaction begins before the effective
date of the repeal of the tax imposed under Subsection (1).
(f) (i) If a tax due under this chapter on a catalogue sale is computed on the
basis of sales and use tax rates published in the catalogue, an enactment or
repeal of a tax described in Subsection (9)(d)(i) takes effect:
(A)  on the first day of a calendar quarter; and
(B)  beginning 60 days after the effective date of the enactment or repeal
under Subsection (9)(d)(i).
(ii)  In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking
Act, the commission may by rule define the term "catalogue sale."
(10)  A county that imposed a sales and use tax under this section prior to
July 1, 2007, may expend revenues allocated in the resolution for the purpose
described in Subsection (2)(a)(iii) on local highway of regional significance
projects in addition to or in substitution of state highway projects within
the county.
